Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.042

Compliance with RCW 39.12.040—Liability of public agencies to workers, laborers, or mechanics.

If any agency of the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws shall knowingly fail to comply with the provisions of RCW 39.12.040 as now or hereafter amended, such agency of the state, or county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be liable to all workers, laborers, or mechanics to the full extent and for the full amount of wages due, pursuant to the prevailing wage requirements of RCW 39.12.020.

[ 1993 c 404 s 3; 1989 c 12 s 11; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 49 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 404: See note following RCW 39.12.070.